Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 270C.33, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Limitations; sales, corporate, and income taxes. new text end new text begin (a) The provisions of this subdivision are a limitation on the assessment authority of the commissioner under this section. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not assess additional tax due under chapter 290 or 297A if each of the following requirements are met: new text end new text begin (1) the taxpayer was given erroneous advice in writing by an employee of the department acting in an official capacity, if the advice: new text end new text begin (i) was reasonably relied on and was included in a tax order or in response to a specific written request by the taxpayer; and new text end new text begin (ii) was not the result of failure by the taxpayer to provide adequate or accurate information; and new text end new text begin (2) effective for a taxable period beginning after the period covered by clause (1), neither the statute or administrative rule on which the reporting or other practice is based has been materially changed, its interpretation has not been changed by a court decision, or there has been a federal adjustment as defined under section 289A.381, subdivision 7, and the commissioner has not issued a revenue notice or directly notified the taxpayer, in writing, of the commissioner's position as to the proper reporting or other treatment of the relevant income, transaction, deduction, credit, or other item of tax preference. new text end new text begin (c) For an audit of a prior taxable period by the commissioner, paragraph (b), clause (1), applies only to the issues within the scope of and specifically addressed by the audit where the written order given to the taxpayer includes erroneous advice on those issues. For a written order that includes data sampling, paragraph (b), clause (1), applies only to the reviewed sampled population. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for erroneous advice given to the taxpayer in writing after June 30, 2025. new text end